Utah statutes.
10-5-121.   Records of council proceedings -- Clerk's records as evidence.

The town clerk shall attend the meetings and keep the record of the proceedings of the council. Copies of all papers filed in the clerk's office and transcripts from all records of the council, if certified by the clerk under the town seal are admissible in all courts as originals.



Enacted by Chapter 34, 1983 General Session

